Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/eo_affix.dat
SFX Z Y 30
SFX Z   a     ism'        a
SFX Z   a     isma        a
SFX Z   a     ismaj       a
SFX Z   a     ismajn      a
SFX Z   a     isman       a
SFX Z   a     isme        a
SFX Z   a     ismo        a
SFX Z   a     ismoj       a
SFX Z   a     ismojn      a
SFX Z   a     ismon       a
SFX Z   0     sm'         i
SFX Z   0     sma         i
SFX Z   0     smaj        i
SFX Z   0     smajn       i
SFX Z   0     sman        i
SFX Z   0     sme         i
SFX Z   0     smo         i
SFX Z   0     smoj        i
SFX Z   0     smojn       i
SFX Z   0     smon        i
SFX Z   o     ism'        o
SFX Z   o     isma        o
SFX Z   o     ismaj       o
SFX Z   o     ismajn      o
SFX Z   o     isman       o
SFX Z   o     isme        o
SFX Z   o     ismo        o
SFX Z   o     ismoj       o
SFX Z   o     ismojn      o
SFX Z   o     ismon       o
